District of Columbia statutes.
47-2885.11

Pharmacy personnel.

(a)

(1)

No personnel working in any capacity, the activities of which include contact with any merchandise or drugs in a pharmacy or the care of dispensing, manufacturing, or storage facilities, who is affected by, or believed by the Mayor, upon reasonable grounds to be affected by, a communicable disease and no person who is or is believed by the Mayor, upon reasonable grounds, to be a carrier of a communicable disease shall actively engage in any work in a pharmacy.

(2)

No proprietor of any pharmacy or manager of any pharmacy shall intentionally permit any person who is, or is believed by the Mayor, upon reasonable grounds, to be, a carrier of a communicable disease to engage or continue to be engaged in any work in the pharmacy.

(b)

No person shall work in any capacity in a pharmacy if he or she:

(1)

Has the following conditions: boils, infectious wounds, sores, or an acute respiratory infection;

(2)

Is wearing unclean garments;

(3)

Is a chronic alcoholic as that term is defined in § 24-602; or

(4)

Does not follow hygienic work practices, including the washing of hands thoroughly before commencing work and as often as is necessary thereafter to remove soil and contamination.

History

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-98, § 12, 27 DCR 3528
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 10, 36 DCR 492
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 73(g), 53 DCR 6198
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 172(e)(1), 56 DCR 1117
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2011.
D.C. Law 16-305, in subsec. (b)(1), substituted “Has the following conditions” for “Is afflicted with”.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-353, in subsec. (b)(1), inserted a colon following “conditions”.
Section 302 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.